Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,225
Certificate of inspection; issuance; form.

Upon a conveyance passing an inspection under section 81-5,222, 81-5,223, or 81-5,224 and receipt of the inspection fee, the State Fire Marshal shall issue the owner or user of the conveyance a certificate of inspection, upon forms prescribed by the State Fire Marshal.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2516;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 61.